Utah statutes.
63J-7-102.   Scope and applicability of chapter.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), and except as otherwise provided by a statute superseding provisions of this chapter by explicit reference to this chapter, the provisions of this chapter apply to each agency and govern each grant received on or after May 5, 2008.

(2)  This chapter does not govern:

(a)  a grant deposited into a General Fund restricted account;

(b)  a grant deposited into a Trust and Agency Fund as defined in Section 51-5-4;

(c)  a grant deposited into an Enterprise Fund as defined in Section 51-5-4;

(d)  a grant made to the state without a restriction or other designated purpose that is deposited into the General Fund as free revenue;

(e)  a grant made to the state that is restricted only to "education" and that is deposited into the Education Fund or Uniform School Fund as free revenue;

(f)  in-kind donations;

(g)  a tax, fees, penalty, fine, surcharge, money judgment, or other money due the state when required by state law or application of state law;

(h)  a contribution made under Title 59, Chapter 10, Part 13, Individual Income Tax Contribution Act;

(i)  a grant received by an agency from another agency or political subdivision;

(j)  a grant to the Dairy Commission created in Title 4, Chapter 22, Dairy Promotion Act;

(k)  a grant to the Utah Science Center Authority created in Title 63H, Chapter 3, Utah Science Center Authority;

(l)  a grant to the Heber Valley Railroad Authority created in Title 63H, Chapter 4, Heber Valley Historic Railroad Authority;

(m)  a grant to the Utah State Railroad Museum Authority created in Title 63H, Chapter 5, Utah State Railroad Museum Authority;

(n)  a grant to the Utah Housing Corporation created in Title 35A, Chapter 8, Part 7, Utah Housing Corporation Act;

(o)  a grant to the Utah State Fair Corporation created in Title 63H, Chapter 6, Utah State Fair Corporation Act;

(p)  a grant to the Workers' Compensation Fund created in Title 31A, Chapter 33, Workers' Compensation Fund;

(q)  a grant to the Utah State Retirement Office created in Title 49, Chapter 11, Utah State Retirement Systems Administration;

(r)  a grant to the School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration created in Title 53C, Chapter 1, Part 2, School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration;

(s)  a grant to the Utah Communications Agency Network created in Title 63C, Chapter 7, Utah Communications Agency Network Act;

(t)  a grant to the Medical Education Program created in Section 53B-24-202;

(u)  a grant to the Utah Capital Investment Corporation created in Title 63M, Chapter 1, Part 12, Utah Venture Capital Enhancement Act;

(v)  a grant to the Utah Charter School Finance Authority created in Section 53A-20b-103;

(w)  a grant to the State Building Ownership Authority created in Section 63B-1-304;

(x)  a grant to the Utah Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool created in Section 31A-29-104; or

(y)  a grant to the Military Installation Development Authority created in Section 63H-1-201.

(3)  An agency need not seek legislative review or approval of grants under Part 2, Grant Approval Requirements, if:

(a)  the governor has declared a state of emergency; and

(b)  the grant is donated to the agency to assist victims of the state of emergency under Subsection 53-2a-204(1).



Amended by Chapter 28, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

